Nevada, session 83, AB468.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.1225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.1225 1. A hospital or other facility which is licensed by
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services that provides residential or outpatient
treatment to children and which operates a private school licensed
pursuant to chapter 394 of NRS may request reimbursement from
the school district or charter school in which a child is enrolled for
the cost of providing educational services to the child if:
(a) The school district or charter school verifies that the child is
a patient or resident of the hospital or facility; [and]
(b) The child attends the private school for more than 7 school
days [.] ; and
(c) For a child who receives only outpatient and not residential
treatment, the child is a pupil with a disability who previously
received special education and related services under the authority
of the school district or charter school in which the child is
enrolled.
2. A hospital or other facility licensed in the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States that provides
residential treatment and which operates an educational program
accredited by a national organization and approved by the
Department of Education may request reimbursement from the
school district or charter school in which a child is enrolled for
the cost of providing educational services to the child if:
(a) The Department and the school district or charter school, as
applicable, verify that the child:
(1) Is a patient or resident of the hospital or facility; and
(2) Is a resident of this State; and
(b) The child:
(1) Is admitted to the hospital or facility on an order from a
physician because the necessary treatment required for the child is
not available in this State;
-
*AB468*

– 3 –
(2) Attends the accredited educational program for more than
7 school days;
(3) Is not homeschooled or enrolled in a private school; and
(4) Has been admitted to the medical facility under the order
of a physician to receive medically necessary treatment for a
medical or mental health condition with which the child has been
diagnosed.
3. A hospital or other facility that wishes to receive
reimbursement pursuant to subsection 2 shall:
(a) Notify the Department and the school district or charter
school in which the child is enrolled upon admitting the child to the
accredited educational program; and
(b) Transfer any educational records of the child to the school
district or charter school in which the child is enrolled in accordance
with any applicable regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 9.
4. Upon receiving a request for reimbursement pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2, the school district or charter school in which the
child is enrolled shall determine the amount of reimbursement to
which the hospital or facility is entitled by multiplying the number
of days determined pursuant to subsection 6 by the following, as
applicable:
(a) The daily rate of the adjusted base per pupil funding for the
school district which the child would otherwise attend. The daily
rate of the adjusted base per pupil funding for the school district
which the child would otherwise attend must be calculated by
dividing the adjusted base per pupil funding provided to the school
district in which the child is enrolled pursuant to NRS 387.1214 by
180.
(b) The daily rate of the statewide base per pupil funding
amount or adjusted base per pupil funding, as applicable, for the
charter school which the child would otherwise attend. The daily
rate of the statewide base per pupil funding amount or adjusted base
per pupil funding, as applicable, for the charter school which the
child would otherwise attend must be calculated by dividing the
statewide base per pupil funding amount or adjusted base per pupil
funding, as applicable, provided to the charter school in which the
child is enrolled pursuant to NRS 387.1214 by 180.
5. If the request for reimbursement is made pursuant to
subsection 1, the child is a pupil with a disability and the hospital or
facility is in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS 388.417 to
388.5243, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
the hospital or facility is also entitled to an amount determined by
increasing the daily rate determined pursuant to subsection 4 by the
statewide multiplier for the pupil established pursuant to
-
*AB468*

– 4 –
NRS 387.122, which is received by the school district or charter
school where the child was enrolled before being placed in the
hospital or facility for the number of days determined pursuant to
subsection 6. The Department shall distribute the money withheld
from the school district or charter school to the hospital or facility.
6. For the purposes of subsections 4 and 5, the amount of
reimbursement to which the hospital or facility is entitled must be
calculated on the basis of the number of school days the child is a
patient or resident of the hospital or facility and attends the private
school or accredited educational program, as applicable, excluding
the 7 school days prescribed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 or
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2, as applicable.
7. A hospital or other facility is not entitled to reimbursement
for days of instruction provided to a child in a year in excess of the
minimum number of days of free school required by NRS 388.090.
8. If a hospital or other facility requests reimbursement from a
school district or charter school for the cost of providing educational
services to a pupil with a disability pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the
school district or charter school in which the child is enrolled shall
be deemed to be the local educational agency for the child for the
purposes of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS 388.417 to 388.5243, inclusive, and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
9. The Department shall adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section, which may include, without
limitation, regulations to:
(a) Prescribe a procedure for the transfer of educational records
pursuant to subsection 3;
(b) Carry out or ensure compliance with the requirements of
subsections 4 and 5 concerning reimbursement for educational
services provided to a pupil with a disability; and
(c) Require the auditing of:
(1) A hospital or other facility that requests reimbursement;
and
(2) A school district or charter school from which
reimbursement is requested,
 pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with any applicable
provisions of federal or state law.
10. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
authorize reimbursement pursuant to this section of a hospital or
facility for the cost of health care services provided to a child.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.012.
(b) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
-
*AB468*

– 5 –
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB468*